Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 1. Absentee Voting by Persons in Armed Forces
[Repealed].

§§ 23-9-1 through 23-9-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 604, eff May 15, 1972.

§23-9-1. [Codes, 1942, § 3196-01; Laws, 1942, ch. 202; Laws, 1944, ch. 171, § 5; ch. 359, § 1]

§23-9-3. [Codes, 1942, § 3196-02; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, § 2]

§23-9-5. [Codes, 1942, § 3196-03; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, § 3]

§23-9-7. [Codes, 1942, § 3196-04; Laws, 1942, ch. 202; Laws, 1944, ch. 171, § 2; Laws, 1952, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, § 4]

§23-9-9. [Codes, 1942, § 3196-05; Laws, 1942, ch. 202; Laws, 1944, ch. 171; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, § 5]

§§23-9-11 and23-9-13. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3196-06, 3196-07; Laws, 1942, ch. 202; Laws, 1944, ch. 171, §§ 4, 5; Laws, 1952, ch. 396, §§ 2, 3]

§§23-9-15 and23-9-17. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3196-08, 3196-09; Laws, 1942, ch. 202; Laws, 1944, ch. 171; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, §§ 8, 9]

§23-9-19. [Codes, 1942, § 3196-10; Laws, 1942, ch. 202; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, § 10]

§§23-9-21 through23-9-25. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3196-11 to 3196-13; Laws, 1942, ch. 202; Laws, 1944, ch. 171; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, §§ 11-13]

§23-9-27. [Codes, 1942, § 3196-14; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, § 14]

§§23-9-29 and23-9-31. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3196-15, 3196-16; Laws, 1944, ch. 171, §§ 7, 9; Laws, 1954, ch. 359, §§ 15, 16]